District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Multiyear Contract No. AGR-25-30000342 with Aramark Management
Services, LP Approval and Payment Authorization Emergency Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 451 of the Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87
Stat. 803; D.C. Code § 1-204.51), and notwithstanding the requirements of section 202 of the
Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law 18-371; D.C.
Code § 2-352.02), the Council approves multiyear Contract No. AGR-25-30000342 with
Aramark Management Services, LP to provide janitorial environmental cleaning and related
services at the Walter E. Washington Convention Center and the Carnegie Library’s exterior
grounds in the not-to-exceed amount of $39,241,788.60 for the goods and services received and
to be received under the contract.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2016 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813;
D.C. Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2